Hawaii statutes.
[§480F-3] Authorized fees. Except as
provided in section 480F-4, no check casher shall charge fees in excess of the
following amounts:

(1) Five per cent of the face amount of the check or
$5, whichever is greater;

(2) Three per cent of the face amount of the check or
$5, whichever is greater, if the check is the payment of any kind of state
public assistance or federal social security benefit payable to the bearer of
the check;

(3) Ten per cent of the face amount of a personal
check or money order, or $5, whichever is greater; or

(4) No more than $10 to set up an initial account and
issue an optional membership or identification card, and no more than $5 for a
replacement optional identification card.

The fees allowed in this section shall not be assessed
in any transaction or agreement in which the check casher defers deposit of the
check. [L 1999, c 146, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 20, §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next